third_party/hyphenation-patterns/src/be/hyph-be.pat.txt
.на2д3п6
-на2д3п6
.на2д3р6
-на2д3р6
.на2д3с6
-на2д3с6
.на2д3т6
-на2д3т6
.на2д3ф6
-на2д3ф6
.на2д3х6
-на2д3х6
.на2д3ц6
-на2д3ц6
.на2д3ч6
-на2д3ч6
.на2д3ш6
-на2д3ш6
.па2д3б6
-па2д3б6
.па2д3в6
-па2д3в6
.па2д3г6
-па2д3г6
.па2д3ґ6
-па2д3ґ6
.па2д3д6
-па2д3д6
.па2д3к6
-па2д3к6
.па2д3л6
-па2д3л6
.па2д3м6
-па2д3м6
.па2д3н6
-па2д3н6
.па2д3п6
-па2д3п6
.па2д3р6
-па2д3р6
.па2д3с6
-па2д3с6
.па2д3т6
-па2д3т6
.па2д3ф6
-па2д3ф6
.па2д3х6
-па2д3х6
.па2д3ц6
-па2д3ц6
.па2д3ч6
-па2д3ч6
.па2д3ш6
-па2д3ш6
.пера2д3б6
-пера2д3б6
.пера2д3в6
-пера2д3в6
.пера2д3г6
-пера2д3г6
.пера2д3ґ6
-пера2д3ґ6
.пера2д3д6
-пера2д3д6
.пера2д3к6
-пера2д3к6
.пера2д3л6
-пера2д3л6
.пера2д3м6
-пера2д3м6
.пера2д3н6
-пера2д3н6
.пера2д3п6
-пера2д3п6
.пера2д3р6
-пера2д3р6
.пера2д3с6
-пера2д3с6
.пера2д3т6
-пера2д3т6
.пера2д3ф6
-пера2д3ф6
.пера2д3х6
-пера2д3х6
.пера2д3ц6
-пера2д3ц6
.пера2д3ч6
-пера2д3ч6
.пера2д3ш6
-пера2д3ш6
.аб3б6
-аб3б6
.аб3в6
-аб3в6
.аб3г6
-аб3г6
.аб3ґ6
-аб3ґ6
.аб3д6
-аб3д6
.аб3ж6
-аб3ж6
.аб3з6
-аб3з6
.аб3к6
-аб3к6
.аб3л6
-аб3л6
.аб3м6
-аб3м6
.аб3н6
-аб3н6
.аб3п6
-аб3п6
.аб3р6
-аб3р6
.аб3с6
-аб3с6
.аб3т6
-аб3т6
.аб3ф6
-аб3ф6
.аб3х6
-аб3х6
.аб3ц6
-аб3ц6
.аб3ч6
-аб3ч6
.аб3ш6
-аб3ш6
.ра2з3б6
-ра2з3б6
.ра2з3в6
-ра2з3в6
.ра2з3г6
-ра2з3г6
.ра2з3ґ6
-ра2з3ґ6
.ра2з3д6
-ра2з3д6
.ра2з3ж6
-ра2з3ж6
.ра2з3з6
-ра2з3з6
.ра2з3к6
-ра2з3к6
.ра2з3л6
-ра2з3л6
.ра2з3м6
-ра2з3м6
.ра2з3н6
-ра2з3н6
.ра2з3п6
-ра2з3п6
.ра2з3р6
-ра2з3р6
.ра2з3с6
-ра2з3с6
.ра2з3т6
-ра2з3т6
.ра2з3ф6
-ра2з3ф6
.ра2з3х6
-ра2з3х6
.ра2з3ц6
-ра2з3ц6
.ра2з3ч6
-ра2з3ч6
.ра2з3ш6
-ра2з3ш6
.уз3б6
-уз3б6
.уз3в6
-уз3в6
.уз3г6
-уз3г6
.уз3ґ6
-уз3ґ6
.уз3д6
-уз3д6
.уз3ж6
-уз3ж6
.уз3з6
-уз3з6
.уз3к6
-уз3к6
.уз3л6
-уз3л6
.уз3м6
-уз3м6
.уз3н6
-уз3н6
.уз3п6
-уз3п6
.уз3р6
-уз3р6
.уз3с6
-уз3с6
.уз3т6
-уз3т6
.уз3ф6
-уз3ф6
.уз3х6
-уз3х6
.уз3ц6
-уз3ц6
.уз3ч6
-уз3ч6
.уз3ш6
-уз3ш6
.ўз3б6
-ўз3б6
.ўз3в6
-ўз3в6
.ўз3г6
-ўз3г6
.ўз3ґ6
-ўз3ґ6
.ўз3д6
-ўз3д6
.ўз3ж6
-ўз3ж6
.ўз3з6
-ўз3з6
.ўз3к6
-ўз3к6
.ўз3л6
-ўз3л6
.ўз3м6
-ўз3м6
.ўз3н6
-ўз3н6
.ўз3п6
-ўз3п6
.ўз3р6
-ўз3р6
.ўз3с6
-ўз3с6
.ўз3т6
-ўз3т6
.ўз3ф6
-ўз3ф6
.ўз3х6
-ўз3х6
.ўз3ц6
-ўз3ц6
.ўз3ч6
-ўз3ч6
.ўз3ш6
-ўз3ш6
.пра2з3б6
-пра2з3б6
.пра2з3в6
-пра2з3в6
.пра2з3г6
-пра2з3г6
.пра2з3ґ6
-пра2з3ґ6
.пра2з3д6
-пра2з3д6
.пра2з3ж6
-пра2з3ж6
.пра2з3з6
-пра2з3з6
.пра2з3к6
-пра2з3к6
.пра2з3л6
-пра2з3л6
.пра2з3м6
-пра2з3м6
.пра2з3н6
-пра2з3н6
.пра2з3п6
-пра2з3п6
.пра2з3р6
-пра2з3р6
.пра2з3с6
-пра2з3с6
.пра2з3т6
-пра2з3т6
.пра2з3ф6
-пра2з3ф6
.пра2з3х6
-пра2з3х6
.пра2з3ц6
-пра2з3ц6
.пра2з3ч6
-пра2з3ч6
.пра2з3ш6
-пра2з3ш6
.ус3б6
-ус3б6
.ус3в6
-ус3в6
.ус3г6
-ус3г6
.ус3ґ6
-ус3ґ6
.ус3д6
-ус3д6
.ус3ж6
-ус3ж6
.ус3з6
-ус3з6
.ус3к6
-ус3к6
.ус3л6
-ус3л6
.ус3м6
-ус3м6
.ус3н6
-ус3н6
.ус3п6
-ус3п6
.ус3р6
-ус3р6
.ус3с6
-ус3с6
.ус3т6
-ус3т6
.ус3ф6
-ус3ф6
.ус3х6
-ус3х6
.ус3ц6
-ус3ц6
.ус3ч6
-ус3ч6
.ус3ш6
-ус3ш6
.ўс3б6
-ўс3б6
.ўс3в6
-ўс3в6
.ўс3г6
-ўс3г6
.ўс3ґ6
-ўс3ґ6
.ўс3д6
-ўс3д6
.ўс3ж6
-ўс3ж6
.ўс3з6
-ўс3з6
.ўс3к6
-ўс3к6
.ўс3л6
-ўс3л6
.ўс3м6
-ўс3м6
.ўс3н6
-ўс3н6
.ўс3п6
-ўс3п6
.ўс3р6
-ўс3р6
.ўс3с6
-ўс3с6
.ўс3т6
-ўс3т6
.ўс3ф6
-ўс3ф6
.ўс3х6
-ўс3х6
.ўс3ц6
-ўс3ц6
.ўс3ч6
-ўс3ч6
.ўс3ш6
-ўс3ш6
.ра2с3б6
-ра2с3б6
.ра2с3в6
-ра2с3в6
.ра2с3г6
-ра2с3г6
.ра2с3ґ6
-ра2с3ґ6
.ра2с3д6
-ра2с3д6
.ра2с3ж6
-ра2с3ж6
.ра2с3з6
-ра2с3з6
.ра2с3к6
-ра2с3к6
.ра2с3л6
-ра2с3л6
.ра2с3м6
-ра2с3м6
.ра2с3н6
-ра2с3н6
.ра2с3п6
-ра2с3п6
.ра2с3р6
-ра2с3р6
.ра2с3с6
-ра2с3с6
.ра2с3т6
-ра2с3т6
.ра2с3ф6
-ра2с3ф6
.ра2с3х6
-ра2с3х6
.ра2с3ц6
-ра2с3ц6
.ра2с3ч6
-ра2с3ч6
.ра2с3ш6
-ра2с3ш6
.ро2з3б6
-ро2з3б6
.ро2з3в6
-ро2з3в6
.ро2з3г6
-ро2з3г6
.ро2з3ґ6
-ро2з3ґ6
.ро2з3д6
-ро2з3д6
.ро2з3ж6
-ро2з3ж6
.ро2з3з6
-ро2з3з6
.ро2з3к6
-ро2з3к6
.ро2з3л6
-ро2з3л6
.ро2з3м6
-ро2з3м6
.ро2з3н6
-ро2з3н6
.ро2з3п6
-ро2з3п6
.ро2з3р6
-ро2з3р6
.ро2з3с6
-ро2з3с6
.ро2з3т6
-ро2з3т6
.ро2з3ф6
-ро2з3ф6
.ро2з3х6
-ро2з3х6
.ро2з3ц6
-ро2з3ц6
.ро2з3ч6
-ро2з3ч6
.ро2з3ш6
-ро2з3ш6
.бя2з3б6
-бя2з3б6
.бя2з3в6
-бя2з3в6
.бя2з3г6
-бя2з3г6
.бя2з3ґ6
-бя2з3ґ6
.бя2з3д6
-бя2з3д6
.бя2з3ж6
-бя2з3ж6
.бя2з3з6
-бя2з3з6
.бя2з3к6
-бя2з3к6
.бя2з3л6
-бя2з3л6
.бя2з3м6
-бя2з3м6
.бя2з3н6
-бя2з3н6
.бя2з3п6
-бя2з3п6
.бя2з3р6
-бя2з3р6
.бя2з3с6
-бя2з3с6
.бя2з3т6
-бя2з3т6
.бя2з3ф6
-бя2з3ф6
.бя2з3х6
-бя2з3х6
.бя2з3ц6
-бя2з3ц6
.бя2з3ч6
-бя2з3ч6
.бя2з3ш6
-бя2з3ш6
.бе2з3б6
-бе2з3б6
.бе2з3в6
-бе2з3в6
.бе2з3г6
-бе2з3г6
.бе2з3ґ6
-бе2з3ґ6
.бе2з3д6
-бе2з3д6
.бе2з3ж6
-бе2з3ж6
.бе2з3з6
-бе2з3з6
.бе2з3к6
-бе2з3к6
.бе2з3л6
-бе2з3л6
.бе2з3м6
-бе2з3м6
.бе2з3н6
-бе2з3н6
.бе2з3п6
-бе2з3п6
.бе2з3р6
-бе2з3р6
.бе2з3с6
-бе2з3с6
.бе2з3т6
-бе2з3т6
.бе2з3ф6
-бе2з3ф6
.бе2з3х6
-бе2з3х6
.бе2з3ц6
-бе2з3ц6
.бе2з3ч6
-бе2з3ч6
.бе2з3ш6
-бе2з3ш6
.бя2с3б6
-бя2с3б6
.бя2с3в6
-бя2с3в6
.бя2с3г6
-бя2с3г6
.бя2с3ґ6
-бя2с3ґ6
.бя2с3д6
-бя2с3д6
.бя2с3ж6
-бя2с3ж6
.бя2с3з6
-бя2с3з6
.бя2с3к6
-бя2с3к6
.бя2с3л6
-бя2с3л6
.бя2с3м6
-бя2с3м6
.бя2с3н6
-бя2с3н6
.бя2с3п6
-бя2с3п6
.бя2с3р6
-бя2с3р6
.бя2с3с6
-бя2с3с6
.бя2с3т6
-бя2с3т6
.бя2с3ф6
-бя2с3ф6
.бя2с3х6
-бя2с3х6
.бя2с3ц6
-бя2с3ц6
.бя2с3ч6
-бя2с3ч6
.бя2с3ш6
-бя2с3ш6
.бе2с3б6
-бе2с3б6
.бе2с3в6
-бе2с3в6
.бе2с3г6
-бе2с3г6
.бе2с3ґ6
-бе2с3ґ6
.бе2с3д6
-бе2с3д6
.бе2с3ж6
-бе2с3ж6
.бе2с3з6
-бе2с3з6
.бе2с3к6
-бе2с3к6
.бе2с3л6
-бе2с3л6
.бе2с3м6
-бе2с3м6
.бе2с3н6
-бе2с3н6
.бе2с3п6
-бе2с3п6
.бе2с3р6
-бе2с3р6
.бе2с3с6
-бе2с3с6
.бе2с3т6
-бе2с3т6
.бе2с3ф6
-бе2с3ф6
.бе2с3х6
-бе2с3х6
.бе2с3ц6
-бе2с3ц6
.бе2с3ч6
-бе2с3ч6
.бе2с3ш6
-бе2с3ш6
.ро2с3б6
-ро2с3б6
.ро2с3в6
-ро2с3в6
.ро2с3г6
-ро2с3г6
.ро2с3ґ6
-ро2с3ґ6
.ро2с3д6
-ро2с3д6
.ро2с3ж6
-ро2с3ж6
.ро2с3з6
-ро2с3з6
.ро2с3к6
-ро2с3к6
.ро2с3л6
-ро2с3л6
.ро2с3м6
-ро2с3м6
.ро2с3н6
-ро2с3н6
.ро2с3п6
-ро2с3п6
.ро2с3р6
-ро2с3р6
.ро2с3с6
-ро2с3с6
.ро2с3т6
-ро2с3т6
.ро2с3ф6
-ро2с3ф6
.ро2с3х6
-ро2с3х6
.ро2с3ц6
-ро2с3ц6
.ро2с3ч6
-ро2с3ч6
.ро2с3ш6
-ро2с3ш6
.цера2з3б6
-цера2з3б6
.цера2з3в6
-цера2з3в6
.цера2з3г6
-цера2з3г6
.цера2з3ґ6
-цера2з3ґ6
.цера2з3д6
-цера2з3д6
.цера2з3ж6
-цера2з3ж6
.цера2з3з6
-цера2з3з6
.цера2з3к6
-цера2з3к6
.цера2з3л6
-цера2з3л6
.цера2з3м6
-цера2з3м6
.цера2з3н6
-цера2з3н6
.цера2з3п6
-цера2з3п6
.цера2з3р6
-цера2з3р6
.цера2з3с6
-цера2з3с6
.цера2з3т6
-цера2з3т6
.цера2з3ф6
-цера2з3ф6
.цера2з3х6
-цера2з3х6
.цера2з3ц6
-цера2з3ц6
.цера2з3ч6
-цера2з3ч6
.цера2з3ш6
-цера2з3ш6
.цера2с3б6
-цера2с3б6
.цера2с3в6
-цера2с3в6
.цера2с3г6
-цера2с3г6
.цера2с3ґ6
-цера2с3ґ6
.цера2с3д6
-цера2с3д6
.цера2с3ж6
-цера2с3ж6
.цера2с3з6
-цера2с3з6
.цера2с3к6
-цера2с3к6
.цера2с3л6
-цера2с3л6
.цера2с3м6
-цера2с3м6
.цера2с3н6
-цера2с3н6
.цера2с3п6
-цера2с3п6
.цера2с3р6
-цера2с3р6
.цера2с3с6
-цера2с3с6
.цера2с3т6
-цера2с3т6
.цера2с3ф6
-цера2с3ф6
.цера2с3х6
-цера2с3х6
.цера2с3ц6
-цера2с3ц6
.цера2с3ч6
-цера2с3ч6
.цера2с3ш6
-цера2с3ш6
.ад7жал
-ад7жал
.ад7жат
-ад7жат
.ад7жац
-ад7жац
.ад7жаў
-ад7жаў
.ад7жар
-ад7жар
.ад7жлукц
-ад7жлукц
.ад7жлукч
-ад7жлукч
.ад7жыв
-ад7жыв
.ад7жыл
-ад7жыл
.ад7жын
-ад7жын
.ад7жыт
-ад7жыт
.ад7жыць
-ад7жыць
.ад7жыў
-ад7жыў
.ад7зав
-ад7зав
.ад7зван
-ад7зван
.ад7звон
-ад7звон
.ад7знак
-ад7знак
.ад7знач
-ад7знач
.ад7знац
-ад7знац
.ад7зыва
-ад7зыва
.ад7зыўн
-ад7зыўн
.на8д7звычай
-на8д7звычай
.на8д7земн
-на8д7земн
.па8д7жар
-па8д7жар
.па8д7жыв
-па8д7жыв
.па8д7жыць
-па8д7жыць
.па8д7жыў
-па8д7жыў
.па8д7жыл
-па8д7жыл
.па8д7зав
-па8д7зав
.па8д7загалова
-па8д7загалова
.па8д7загалоў
-па8д7загалоў
.па8д7закус
-па8д7закус
.па8д7закуш
-па8д7закуш
.па8д7зараб
-па8д7зараб
.па8д7зароб
-па8д7зароб
.па8д7земн
-па8д7земн
.па8д7зяме
-па8д7зяме
.па8д7зор
-па8д7зор
.па8д7зыва
-па8д7зыва
тэ8мбр.
тэ8мбр-
.дву8х3
-дву8х3
.тро8х3
-тро8х3
.чатыро8х3
-чатыро8х3
слова7ў8твар
віда1з8мян
віда1з8мен
за1п8люшч
вё8рст
раз5г8ляд
раз5г8лед
зло7ў8жыв
.вы1к8люч
-вы1к8люч
.шма8т1
-шма8т1
крова3ў8твар
за3ц8вярдз
.па3г8лядз
-па3г8лядз
на5д8вор
